Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1521.11
Hazardous waste; site review committee; meetings; officers; professional facilitator.

The director shall organize a meeting of the committee within twenty-one days of the filing of a notice of intent by an applicant. The director shall serve as temporary chairperson of the committee and shall select as a professional facilitator a person trained in group dynamics and objectivity to handle committee meetings with the public and the applicant. At its first meeting, the committee shall select a chairperson and any other officers it deems necessary and shall adopt procedures for gathering information and preparing a report. The committee shall hold factfinding meetings near the proposed site for the facility. The applicant shall make a technical advisor and other resource people available to the committee.

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 5.